Hawaii, session 2026, SB2677.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 302D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302D-     School meals. (a)  Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, free school meals shall be provided to every student enrolled in a public charter school that is participating in the National School Lunch Program whose family income is no more than three hundred per cent of the federal poverty level, regardless of a student's eligibility for participation in the federal school meals program. (b) No student shall be denied a meal solely for failure to pay for the meal. (c)  The commission may adopt rules or policies governing the collection of funds for student meal accounts with a negative fund balance; provided that no rule or policy shall prohibit feeding a student or otherwise conflict with subsection (b). (d) It is the intent of this section not to jeopardize the receipt of any federal aid and to the extent, and only to the extent necessary to effectuate this intent, the governor may modify the strict provisions of this section, but shall promptly report any such modification with the governor's reasons therefore to the next succeeding session of the legislature for review. (e) As used in this section, "school meals" means breakfast and lunch prepared and served by a school cafeteria or a food vendor that is located outside of school grounds, as designated by a public charter school." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for meal subsidies for students at public charter schools whose family income is no more than three hundred per cent of the federal poverty level. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the state public charter school commission for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________